Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,218
Facility; notifications required.

(1) The owner or operator of each facility in which an extremely hazardous substance exceeding threshold planning quantities is present shall notify the Nebraska Emergency Management Agency that such facility is subject to the Nebraska Emergency Planning and Community Right to Know Act and shall notify the Nebraska Emergency Management Agency and the local emergency planning committee of the emergency planning district in which the facility is located that such facility is subject to the act within sixty days after an extremely hazardous substance first becomes present at such facility in excess of the threshold planning quantity established for such substance. If there is a revision of the definition of extremely hazardous substances and the facility has present a substance included in the revised definition in excess of the threshold planning quantity established for such substance, the owner or operator of the facility shall notify the Nebraska Emergency Management Agency and the committee of the district in which the facility is located within sixty days after such revision that such facility is subject to the act.

(2) The Nebraska Emergency Management Agency shall notify the director of facilities subject to the act. The notification shall include:

(a) Each notification received from a facility under subsection (1) of this section; and

(b) Each facility designated by the Nebraska Emergency Management Agency under subsection (3) of this section.

(3) For purposes of emergency planning, the Nebraska Emergency Management Agency may designate additional facilities which are subject to the act if such designation is made after public notice and opportunity for comment. The Nebraska Emergency Management Agency shall notify the facility concerned of any designation under this subsection.

Laws 1997, LB 374, § 28;

Laws 2026, LB905, § 51.
July 1, 2026